test/src/morphology/N-wigiz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - õigiz: # Noun 203 'eng /est õigus/fin' - full paradigm
     õigiz+N+Sg+Nom: õigiz
     õigiz+N+Sg+Gen: õigiz
     õigiz+N+Sg+Par: õigizt
     õigiz+N+Sg+Dat: õigizõn
     õigiz+N+Sg+Ins: õigizõks
     õigiz+N+Sg+Ill: õigizõ
     õigiz+N+Sg+Ela: õigizõst
     õigiz+N+Pl+Nom: õigizt
     õigiz+N+Pl+Gen: õigizt
     õigiz+N+Pl+Par: õigiži
     õigiz+N+Pl+Dat: õigiztõn
     õigiz+N+Pl+Ins: õigiztõks
     õigiz+N+Pl+Ill: õigižiz
     õigiz+N+Pl+Ela: õigižist
